Washington statutes.
RCW 4.100.020

Claim for compensation—Definitions.

(1) Any person convicted in superior court and subsequently imprisoned for one or more felonies of which he or she is actually innocent may file a claim for compensation against the state.

(2) For purposes of this chapter, a person is:

(a) "Actually innocent" of a felony if he or she did not engage in any illegal conduct alleged in the charging documents; and

(b) "Wrongly convicted" if he or she was charged, convicted, and imprisoned for one or more felonies of which he or she is actually innocent.

(3)(a) If the person entitled to file a claim under subsection (1) of this section is incapacitated and incapable of filing the claim, or if he or she is a minor, or is a nonresident of the state, the claim may be filed on behalf of the claimant by an authorized agent.

(b) A claim filed under this chapter survives to the personal representative of the claimant as provided in RCW 4.20.046.

[ 2013 c 175 s 2.]